Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201681-1455
Eyewitness suspect identification; written policy; contents; Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; duties.

(1) On or before January 1, 2017, the Nebraska State Patrol, each county sheriff, each city or village police department, and any other law enforcement agency in this state which conducts eyewitness suspect identifications shall adopt a written policy on eyewitness suspect identifications and provide a copy of such policy to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice. The policy shall include the minimum standards developed by the commission relating to the following: (a) Standards which describe the administration of a lineup, (b) procedures governing the instructions given by a peace officer to an eyewitness, and (c) procedures for documentation of the eyewitness's level of certainty of an identification.

(2) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall distribute a standard model written policy on suspect identification by eyewitnesses. Any law enforcement agency described in subsection (1) of this section which fails to adopt its own policy as required by this section shall adopt the commission's standard model written policy.

Laws 2016, LB1000, § 4.
July 21, 2016